Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.540

Limitations on liability for equine activities—Exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an equine activity sponsor or an equine professional shall not be liable for an injury to or the death of a participant engaged in an equine activity, and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no participant nor participant's representative may maintain an action against or recover from an equine activity sponsor or an equine professional for an injury to or the death of a participant engaged in an equine activity.

(2)(a) RCW 4.24.530 and 4.24.540 do not apply to the horse racing industry as regulated in chapter 67.16 RCW.

(b) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall prevent or limit the liability of an equine activity sponsor or an equine professional:

(i) If the equine activity sponsor or the equine professional:

(A) Provided the equipment or tack and the equipment or tack caused the injury; or

(B) Provided the equine and failed to make reasonable and prudent efforts to determine the ability of the participant to engage safely in the equine activity, determine the ability of the equine to behave safely with the participant, and determine the ability of the participant to safely manage the particular equine;

(ii) If the equine activity sponsor or the equine professional owns, leases, rents, or otherwise is in lawful possession and control of the land or facilities upon which the participant sustained injuries because of a dangerous latent condition which was known to or should have been known to the equine activity sponsor or the equine professional and for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted;

(iii) If the equine activity sponsor or the equine professional commits an act or omission that constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant and that act or omission caused the injury;

(iv) If the equine activity sponsor or the equine professional intentionally injures the participant;

(v) Under liability provisions as set forth in the products liability laws; or

(vi) Under liability provisions in chapter 16.04, *16.13, or * 16.16 RCW.

[ 1989 c 292 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapters 16.13 and 16.16 RCW were each recodified and/or repealed in their entirety by 1989 c 286. For disposition of chapters 16.13 and 16.16 RCW, see Table of Disposition of Former RCW Sections.

Application—1989 c 292 ss 1 and 2: See note following RCW 4.24.530.